Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
633

SMALL
CLAIMS, DISTRICT COURTS

Section

633-1 to 7 Repealed

633-8 Order to show cause

633-11 to 15 Repealed

633-16 Unauthorized removal of shopping carts,
etc.; notice;

exceptions

633-21 to 26 Repealed

633-27 District courts; powers

633-28 Small claims, no appeal; appearance by
whom

633-29 Fees and costs; waiver

633-30 Counterclaim; retention of jurisdiction

633-31 Jury trial; demand; assignment to other
court

633-32 Evidence

633-33 Judgment for wages; oral examination;
payment

633-34 Award of costs

633-35 Other rights of judgment creditor

633-36 Forms and public information

633-37 Repealed

Revision Note

Throughout chapter, "this chapter" is substituted
for "sections 633-27 to 633-37" pursuant to §23G-15.

Law Journals and Reviews

Measuring the Scales: An Empirical Look at the Hawaii Small
Claims Court. 12 HBJ, no. 2, at 3 (1976).

The Hawaii Small Claims Court: An Empirical Study. 12 HBJ, no.
2, at 19 (1976).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next